Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 2. Charges for State Services; Accounting.

Sec. 37.10.050.
Charges by state agencies; collection, accounting, and deposit of state money.

A state agency may not charge a fee for the provision of state services unless the fee (1) is set or otherwise authorized by statute; and (2) where a regulation is necessary, is set by or provided for in a regulation that meets the standards of AS

44.62.020

and

44.62.030

. Unless specifically exempted by statute, a state agency authorized to collect or receive fees, licenses, taxes, or other money belonging to the state shall account for and remit the receipts, less fees to which the collector is entitled by statute or regulation, to the Department of Revenue at least once each month. The commissioner of administration shall separately account under AS

37.05.142

for receipts deposited under this subsection. A fee or other charge that is set by regulation may not exceed the estimated actual costs of the state agency in administering the activity or providing the service unless otherwise provided by the statute under which the regulation is adopted; however, this limitation does not apply to sale or lease of property by a state agency, fees charged by a resource agency for a designated regulatory service as defined in AS

37.10.058

, fees adopted by the Department of Natural Resources under AS

41.21.026(f)

, AS

44.37.025

, and

44.37.027

, or fees, rents, tolls, and other charges established or levied by the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for the use of the Knik Arm bridge and appurtenant facilities.

Money collected for the state shall be deposited by the collector in the nearest bank to the account of the Department of Revenue when the Department of Revenue directs this to be done.

Except as provided in AS

37.10.052(a)

, each state agency shall annually review fees collected by the agency. By October 1, each state agency shall submit a report to the office of management and budget regarding existing fee levels set by the agency by regulation and adjustments made to fee levels by the agency during the previous fiscal year, and recommended adjustments in fees set by statute that the agency collects. Each year by December 15, the office of management and budget shall submit a report to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee summarizing the reports and recommendations and the extent to which the fee adjustments have been incorporated in the governor’s budget. Within five days after the convening of each regular session of the legislature, the committee shall prepare a report on the status of fee regulations and making recommendations for changes in regulations or statutes as appropriate. The committee shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 2 ch 24 SLA 1953; am § 8 art III ch 82 SLA 1955; am § 5 ch 186 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 115 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 36 SLA 1990; am § 10 ch 2 FSSLA 1992; am § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 60 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 2003; am § 13 ch 34 SLA 2007; am § 11 ch 51 SLA 2014; am § 2 ch 26 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section derived from § 12-2-1 ACLA 1949, which was repealed by § 48, ch. 133, SLA 1951 and reenacted by § 2, ch. 24, SLA 1953. The reference to § 8, art. III, ch. 82, SLA 1955 in the historical citation is to the second of two identically numbered sections. The 1957 amendment corrected the error.

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For user fees, see 18 AAC 50, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 20, 2016, in (a), inserted “AS

41.21.026(f)

,” preceding “AS

44.37.025

” and substituted “and” for “or” preceding “44.37.027”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 93, ch. 36, SLA 1990, retroactive to July 1, 1987, provides that notwithstanding the amendment to AS

37.10.050(a)

by § 1, ch. 138, SLA 1986, “a fee charged by an agency under a regulation that was adopted before July 1, 1987, under authority of a statute that does not expressly authorize a charge for a service, is valid if it would have been valid before the 1986 amendment of AS

37.10.050(a)

. The regulation and fee remain in effect, and the agency may charge for the service, until the regulation is repealed or amended by the agency. To amend the regulation to change the fee, the agency shall meet the standard of AS 37.10.050(a) as amended by § 2 of this Act.”

Sec. 37.10.052.
Fees levied by resource agencies for designated regulatory services; negotiated service agreements.

Each resource agency shall, by regulation, establish a list of fixed fees for standard designated regulatory services that it provides. A fixed fee adopted under this subsection may not exceed the estimated average reasonable direct cost incurred by the resource agency in providing the standard designated regulatory service. The resource agency shall provide an explanation of the basis for the fixed fee. The resource agency shall review the list of fixed fees at least once every four years, identify any changes in the average actual and reasonable direct cost of providing each standard designated regulatory service for which a fixed fee has been established, and, by regulation, adjust the fees accordingly. The agency shall include the results of its review in the report submitted under AS

37.10.050(c)

.

In the case of a designated regulatory service for which a resource agency has not established a fixed fee under (a) of this section, a resource agency shall, at the request of the person who will be billed for a designated regulatory service, attempt to reach a negotiated service agreement for provision of that service. A negotiated service agreement that is reached under this subsection is a contract that is enforceable by either party under generally applicable contract remedies provided by law. A negotiated service agreement reached under this subsection may include

the amount of the fee;

the structure or methodology by which the fee will be charged;

deadlines, sequences, or milestones for the provision of the regulatory service; and

other matters reasonably related to the cost of, or procedures for, the provision of the regulatory service.

A person requiring more than one regulatory service, at least one of which is a designated regulatory service, for an activity may petition the resource agency that will provide the services or, if more than one resource agency will provide a regulatory service, the office of management and budget to establish a single fee for all regulatory services that are required for that class of activities. The resource agency or office of management and budget, as appropriate, shall grant the petition if it finds that the proposed fee meets the applicable requirements of this subsection and is likely to be used by the resource agency or office of management and budget more than once. If a petition under this subsection is granted, the resource agency or the office of management and budget shall make available to the public information concerning the single fee, including a list of regulatory services to be provided and the amount of the fee. If the resource agency or the office of management and budget denies the petition, the agency or office shall provide to the petitioner a statement setting out the agency’s or office’s reasons for denial. The single fee under this subsection must be

confined to the distinct economic sector in which the petitioner is or proposes to be engaged;

where necessary, limited by geography, facility size or capacity, or other relevant factors so as to provide a reasonable assurance that only similarly situated activities, with respect to cost, are included within the fixed fee; and

based on the estimated average reasonable direct cost of each designated regulatory service required for the activity and the average fee customarily charged for a regulatory service other than a designated regulatory service discounted by the amount of savings that may be achieved by avoiding regulatory overlap and, where applicable, coordinating multi-agency review of the activity to the maximum extent possible.

Except for fees determined under (a), (b), or (c) of this section or in AS

37.10.056

, a fee levied by a resource agency for a designated regulatory service must be based solely on the actual and reasonable direct cost incurred by the resource agency in providing the designated regulatory service to the person on whom that fee is levied, computed on a time-and-expense basis.

Nothing in this section authorizes or requires a resource agency to charge a fee for a designated regulatory service.

No action taken by a resource agency or the office of management and budget under (c) of this section is subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 2 ch 59 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For user fees, see 18 AAC 50, art. 4.

For reserved, see 18 AAC 60, art. 6.

For permit process, see 18 AAC 83, art. 2.

Sec. 37.10.054.
Invoices for designated regulatory services.

Unless a negotiated service agreement reached under AS

37.10.052(b)

or (c) provides otherwise, a resource agency charging a fee for providing a designated regulatory service other than a standard designated regulatory service for which a fixed fee has been established under AS

37.10.052(a)

shall, on a monthly basis, provide the person who will be billed for the service with an invoice for services performed during that month. The invoice must be reasonably convenient to the reader, and reasonably susceptible to audit. The invoice must set out, in time increments of not greater than one-quarter hour for each employee, and separately for each expenditure, the purpose of the time or expenditure in sufficient detail to permit a reasonable person to determine whether the time or cost was an actual and reasonable direct cost.

If a person believes that an invoice rendered under (a) of this section exceeds the actual and reasonable direct cost of providing the designated regulatory service, the person may, within 30 days after receiving the invoice, request that the resource agency review the invoice. The resource agency shall review the invoice under the standards of this section and issue its final decision on the invoice within 30 days of receipt of a request for review.

History.

(§ 2 ch 59 SLA 2000)

Sec. 37.10.056.
Petitions to adopt regulations.

A person requiring a designated regulatory service from a resource agency may petition the resource agency under AS

44.62.220

and

44.62.230

to adopt regulations that would establish, for a category of designated regulatory services, a fixed fee that is

confined to the distinct economic sector in which the petitioner is or proposes to be engaged;

where necessary, limited by geography, facility size or capacity, or other relevant factors so as to provide a reasonable assurance that only similarly situated regulatory services, with respect to cost, are included within the fixed fee;

likely to be used by the resource agency more than once; and

based on the average reasonable direct cost incurred by the agency in providing the designated regulatory service.

History.

(§ 2 ch 59 SLA 2000)

Sec. 37.10.058.
Definitions.

In AS

37.10.050

—

37.10.058

,

“agency” means a board, commission, or agency in the legislative, judicial, or executive branch, but does not include the University of Alaska or a public corporation;

“designated regulatory service” means a regulatory service provided under the following regulatory programs:

control of solid waste facilities under AS

46.03.020

(10)(D) and (E);

regulation of the disposal of waste into waters of the state under AS

46.03.100

;

certification of federal permits or authorizations under 33 U.S.C. 1341 (sec. 401, Clean Water Act);

any authorization for the use or appropriation of water under AS 46.15;

administration of emission control permits for the air quality control program under AS 46.14; and

regulation of pesticides and broadcast chemicals registered under AS

46.03.320(a)(4)

;

“direct cost” means the hourly rate of salary and benefits of each agency employee, including clerical staff, directly involved in providing a regulatory service, multiplied by the number of hours spent in performing the service, together with the expenditures for goods or third-party services made in providing that service; “direct cost” does not include

the costs and salaries of administrative, support, or supervisory personnel who are not directly engaged in providing the service;

other budgeted overhead expenses, including rent and utilities;

interagency charges that would not meet the requirements of AS

37.10.052

—

37.10.058

if those charges had been incurred or invoiced by the agency providing the designated regulatory service;

public consultation costs when the consultation is not required by law;

costs related to an appeal of permit issuance by a person other than the applicant for that permit;

expenses that are not reasonably necessary to comply with the law under which the service is provided; or

travel expenses for inspecting businesses having not more than 20 employees;

“distinct economic sector” means a commercial or industrial segment, or other category of land or water use, that, because of common operational, environmental, or other factors, tends to require similar designated regulatory services; each of the following is an example of a “distinct economic sector”: (A) oil and gas exploration, development, and production; (B) oil and gas processing and refining; (C) mineral exploration, development, and production; (D) coal exploration, development, and production; (E) commercial fishing; (F) seafood processing; (G) timber harvest; (H) timber processing; and (I) residential development; nothing in this paragraph precludes a resource agency from further subdividing activities listed in (A) — (I) of this paragraph into more appropriate subcategories;

“fee” means a charge assessed or requested by a state agency for the provision of a service to, the incurring of a burden or cost because of, or the conferring of a benefit upon, a person; “fee” does not include charges assessed or requested by the Department of Natural Resources associated with pipeline right-of-way leases granted under AS 38.35;

“hourly rate of salary and benefits” means the hourly increment of salary due the state employee under the salary schedule applicable to that employee, multiplied by 149 percent to account for the cost of employment benefits paid by the state to or on behalf of the employee;

“permit” means a permit, license, certificate, or approval;

“regulatory service” includes the following services provided by a resource agency:

an analysis, deliberation, testing, inspection, approval, or other review related to the application for or issuance, modification, extension, or revocation of a permit; and

an inspection, testing, monitoring, or compliance review undertaken under law or the terms of a permit;

“resource agency” means the Department of Environmental Conservation, the Department of Fish and Game, and the Department of Natural Resources;

“standard designated regulatory service” means designated regulatory services for categories of activities that do not generally raise complex or controversial legal, technical, or policy issues.

History.

(§ 2 ch 59 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 59 SLA 2000; am § 3 ch 100 SLA 2001; am § 2 ch 46 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 31 SLA 2005; am § 2 ch 42 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For user fees, see 18 AAC 50, art. 4.

Sec. 37.10.060.
Department of Revenue to deposit money in state treasury.

All fees and receipts received by the Department of Revenue from any source shall be deposited in the state treasury at least once each month, and credited by the department to the proper fund.

History.

(§ 12-2-2 ACLA 1949)